Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Mississippi Re-Entry Council

§ 47-7-101.
Mississippi Re-Entry Council; purpose; steering committee membership and duties.

There is created the Mississippi Re-Entry Council. The purpose of the council is to create effective strategies to assist former inmates in their return to the general population, to reduce the recidivism rates of inmates, to increase public safety, and to reduce budgetary constraints presently created by prison-related costs. The Re-Entry Council shall be led by a steering committee.

The Re-Entry Council Steering Committee shall be composed of the following twelve (12) members, who shall serve for two-year terms:

A Mississippi United States Attorney, or a designee appointed by the Governor;

The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, or a designee;

The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi, or a designee;

The director of a faith-based organization involved in re-entry programs, or a designee appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

The Chief Probation Officer of the United States District Courts of Mississippi, or a designee;

A Mississippi United States District Judge, or a designee appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court, or a designee;

The Executive Director for the Mississippi Department of Mental Health, or a designee;

The Executive Director for the Mississippi Division of Medicaid, or a designee;

The Chairman of the Parole Board, or a designee;

A person who is a former offender appointed by the Chairman of the Parole Board; and

The Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or a designee.

The Re-Entry Council Steering Committee shall have the following duties:

To consider development of a statewide approach to assist re-entry of former inmates into the general population of this state;

To provide recommendations regarding evidence-based approaches that equip inmates with the requisite, individualized resources to promote their successful return to the general population of this state;

To review reports, studies, and materials as it deems appropriate;

To appoint such subcommittees as it finds proper;

To study proposed legislation that seeks to resolve recidivism;

To submit recommendations from its findings to the Legislature, the Governor and the Mississippi Supreme Court. In making such recommendations, the Re-entry Council Steering Committee will seek input from all branches of state and local government, governmental agencies, businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout this state;

To seek and receive grants;

To hire contract personnel and/or staff using any grants received; and

To collaborate with the coordinator of the transitional re-entry center, under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, which shall provide administrative support to the council.

The Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court shall call the first meeting of the steering committee. At its first meeting, the steering committee shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from its membership and adopt rules for transacting its business and keeping records. Officers shall serve one-year terms or until such time as a successor is elected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2015.).